Hawaii statutes.
§846-2 Establishment of the Hawaii criminal
justice data center. There shall be a data center, to be known as the "Hawaii
criminal justice data center", established in the department of the
attorney general. The data center shall be directed and managed by an
administrator appointed by the attorney general subject to chapter 76. [L 1979,
c 129, pt of §2; am L 1980, c 269, §2; am L 1982, c 57, §1; am L 1983, c 78,
§3(4); am L 1985, c 165, §2; am L 1986, c 65, §1; am L 1987, c 146, §3; am L
2000, c 253, §150]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next